Vermont, session 2025-2026, H255.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 1028 is amended to read:
§ 1028. ASSAULT OF PROTECTED PROFESSIONAL; ASSAULT WITH
BODILY FLUIDS
VT LEG #380880 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.255
2025 Page 2 of 3
(a) A person convicted of a simple or aggravated assault against a protected
professional as defined in subdivision (d)(1) of this section while the protected
professional is performing a lawful duty, or with the intent to prevent the
protected professional from performing his or her the protected professional’s
lawful duty, in addition to any other penalties imposed under sections 1023 and
1024 of this title, shall:
(1) for the first offense, be imprisoned not more than one year; and
(2) for the second offense and subsequent offenses, be imprisoned not
more than 10 years.
(b)(1) No person shall intentionally cause blood, vomitus, excrement,
mucus, saliva, semen, or urine to come in contact with a protected professional
while the person is performing a lawful duty.
(2) A person who violates this subsection shall be imprisoned not more
than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.
(c) In imposing a sentence under this section, the court shall take into
consideration whether the defendant was a patient at the time of the offense
and had a psychiatric illness, the symptoms of which were exacerbated by the
surrounding circumstances, irrespective of whether the illness constituted an
affirmative defense to the charge.
(d) As used in this section:
VT LEG #380880 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.255
2025 Page 3 of 3
(1) “Protected professional” shall mean means a law enforcement
officer; a firefighter; a health care worker; an employee, contractor, or grantee
of the Department for Children and Families; a public transit worker; or any
emergency medical personnel as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 2651(6).
(2) “Health care facility” shall have has the same meaning as defined in
18 V.S.A. § 9432(8).
(3) “Health care worker” means an employee of a health care facility or
a licensed physician who is on the medical staff of a health care facility who
provides direct care to patients or who is part of a team-response to a patient or
visitor incident involving real or potential violence.
(4) “Public transit worker” means:
(A) a driver providing public transit as an employee or a volunteer; or
(B) an employee supporting public transit riders at a transit center.
(e) This section shall not apply to an individual under 18 years of age
residing in a residential rehabilitation facility.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380880 v.1